Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1442
Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, how cited.

Sections 60-1442 to 60-1474 shall be known and may be cited as the Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 1.
October 1, 2026